Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.150

Immunization program—Superintendent of public instruction by rule to adopt procedures for verifying records.

The superintendent of public instruction by rule shall provide procedures for schools to quickly verify the immunization records of students transferring from one school to another before the immunization records are received.

[ 1985 c 49 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.31.117.]